bg-BG: Материал на контактите: Месинг; Мед; Позлатено покритие; Никелирана стомана; Фосфорен бронз; Неръждаема стомана; Калайдисано; Други
sl-SI: Material kontaktov: Medenina; Baker; Pozlačena; Ponikljan jeklo; Fosforjev bron; Nerjavno jeklo; Pokositrena; Drugo
sv: Kontaktmaterial: Mässing; Koppar; Guldplätering; Nickelpläterat stål; Fosforbrons; Rostfritt stål; Tennplätering; Övrigt
th: วัสดุหน้าสัมผัส: ทองเหลือง; สีทองแดง; ชุบทอง; เหล็กชุบนิกเกิล; ฟอสเฟอร์บรอนซ์; สเตนเลสสตีล; ชุบดีบุก; อื่นๆ
el: Υλικό επαφής: Ορείχαλκος; Χαλκός; Επίχρυσο; Επινικελωμένος χάλυβας; Φωσφορούχος ορείχαλκος; Ανοξείδωτος χάλυβας; Επενδεδυμένο με κασσίτερο; Άλλο
de: Kontaktmaterial: Messing; Kupfer; Vergoldet; Vernickelter Stahl; Phosphorbronze; Edelstahl; Verzinnt; Sonstiges
hu: Érintkező anyaga: Sárgaréz; Réz; Aranyozott; Nikkelezett acél; Foszforbronz; Rozsdamentes acél; Ónozott; Egyéb
vi: Vật liệu tiếp điểm: Đồng; Màu đồng đỏ; Mạ vàng; Thép mạ niken; Đồng phốt pho; Thép không gỉ; Mạ thiếc; Khác
pt-PT: Material dos contactos: Latão; Cobre; Banhado a ouro; Aço niquelado; Bronze fosforoso; Aço inoxidável; Banhado a estanho; Outro
da: Kontaktmateriale: Messing; Kobber; Forgyldt; Nikkelbelagt stål; Fosforbronze; Rustfrit stål; Fortinnet; Andet
lt-LT: Kontaktų medžiaga: Žalvaris; Varis; Paauksuotas; Nikeliu dengtas plienas; Fosforo bronza; Nerūdijantysis plienas; Dengtas skarda; Kita
zh-TW: 接點材料: 黃銅; 紅銅色; 鍍金; 鍍鎳鋼; 磷青銅; 不銹鋼; 鍍錫; 其他
hr-HR: Materijal kontakta: Mjed; Bakar; Pozlaćeno; Čelik prevučen niklom; Fosforna bronza; Nehrđajući čelik; Obloženo kositrom; Ostalo
nl: Contactmateriaal: Messing; Koper; Verguld goud; Vernikkeld staal; Fosforbrons; Roestvast staal; Vertind; Andere
nb: Kontaktmateriale: Messing; Kobber; Gullbelagt; Nikkelbelagt stål; Fosforbronse; Rustfritt stål; Tinnbelagt; Annet
pt-BR: Material dos contatos: Latão; Cobre; Banhado a ouro; Aço niquelado; Bronze fosforoso; Aço inoxidável; Banhado a estanho; Outro
ja: 接点材料: 真鍮; コッパー; 金メッキ; ニッケルメッキ鋼; りん青銅; ステンレススチール; 錫メッキ; その他
fi: Kontaktimateriaali: Messinki; Kupari; Kullattu; Nikkelipinnoitettu teräs; Fosforipronssi; Ruostumaton teräs; Tinapinnoitettu; Muu
cs: Materiál kontaktů: Mosaz; Měděná; Pozlacené; Poniklovaná ocel; Fosforový bronz; Nerezová ocel; Pocínované; Jiné
ro-RO: Material de contact: Alamă; Cupru; Placat cu aur; Oțel placat cu nichel; Bronz fosforos; Oțel inoxidabil; Placat cu cositor; Altele
es: Material de los contactos: Latón; Cobre; Bañado en oro; Acero niquelado; Bronce fosforado; Acero inoxidable; Estañado; Otros
it: Materiale dei contatti: Ottone; Rame; Placcato oro; Acciaio nichelato; Bronzo al fosforo; Acciaio inossidabile; Placcato stagno; Altro
zh-CN: 触点材料: 黄铜; 铜; 镀金; 镀镍钢; 磷青铜; 不锈钢; 镀锡; 其他
ru: Материал контактов: Латунь; Медь; Позолота; Никелированная сталь; Фосфористая бронза; Нержавеющая сталь; Покрытие оловом; Другой
tr: Kontak malzemesi: Pirinç; Bakır; Altın kaplama; Nikel kaplı çelik; Fosfor bronz; Paslanmaz çelik; Kalay kaplama; Diğer
fr: Matériau de contact: Laiton; Cuivre; Plaqué or; Acier nickelé; Bronze phosphoreux; Acier inoxydable; Étamé; Autre
ko: 접점 재료: 황동; 구리; 금 도금; 니켈 도금 강철; 인청동; 스테인리스 스틸; 주석 도금; 기타
en: Contact material: Brass; Copper; Gold-plated; Nickel-plated steel; Phosphor bronze; Stainless steel; Tin-plated; Other
sk-SK: Materiál kontaktov: Mosadz; Meď; Pozlátený; Poniklovaná oceľ; Fosforový bronz; Nehrdzavejúca oceľ; Pokovované; Iné
pl: Materiał styków: Mosiądz; Miedź; Pozłacany; Stal niklowana; Brąz fosforowy; Stal nierdzewna; Cynowany; Inne